Virginia statutes. Title 59.1. Trade and Commerce.
Chapter 24.2. Septic System Inspectors.

§ 59.1-310.7.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter unless the context requires otherwise:

“Accredited septic system inspector” means a person who possesses the qualifications required by the provisions of this chapter.

“Person” means an individual, partnership, corporation, association, or other entity.

“Septic system” means an onsite method of disposing of sewage when sewers or sewerage facilities are not available and includes septic tanks, septic tank lines and drainage fields or other onsite, residential sewage systems.

History.
2001, c. 52.

Effective date.

Acts 2001, c. 52, cl. 2, as amended by Acts 2002, c. 106, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2003.”

§ 59.1-310.8.
Exceptions.

This chapter shall not be construed to prohibit:

The work of an employee or a subordinate of an accredited septic system inspector;

The practice of any profession or occupation that is regulated by a regulatory board within the Department of Professional and Occupational Regulation or other state agency; or

The work of employees of the Department of Health in carrying out their regulatory duties under Chapter 6 (§

32.1-163

et seq.) of Title 32.1.

History.
2001, c. 52.

Effective date.

Acts 2001, c. 52, cl. 2, as amended by Acts 2002, c. 106, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2003.”

§ 59.1-310.9.
Requirements for accredited septic system inspectors and performance of septic system inspections.

In order to use the title of “accredited septic system inspector” in connection with any real estate transaction, including refinancings, an applicant shall be accredited by the National Sanitation Foundation or an equivalent national accrediting organization,
which accreditation shall include the passage of both a written and practical examination on the principles and practice of septic system inspections.In addition, the applicant shall satisfy the following requirements:

Hold a high school diploma or equivalent; and

Have evidence of at least one year of active field experience conducting onsite septic systems inspections or completion of a nationally approved training course.

Any individual who holds a valid onsite sewage system operator, onsite sewage system installer, or onsite soil evaluator license pursuant to Chapter 23 (§

54.1-2300

et seq.) of Title 54.1 shall be authorized to perform a septic system inspection in connection with any real estate transaction, including refinancings.

History.
2001, c. 52; 2020, c. 521.

Effective date.

Acts 2001, c. 52, cl. 2, as amended by Acts 2002, c. 106, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2003.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 521 added subsection B.

§ 59.1-310.10.
Penalty for violation.

No person shall use the title “accredited septic system inspector” or perform a septic system inspection in connection with any real estate transaction unless he meets the requirements of this chapter. Any person who violates the provisions of this chapter
is guilty of a Class 3 misdemeanor.

History.
2001, c. 52; 2020, c. 521.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 3 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

Effective date.

Acts 2001, c. 52, cl. 2, as amended by Acts 2002, c. 106, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2003.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 521, in the first sentence, inserted “or perform a septic system inspection in connection with any real estate transaction,” and in the last sentence, substituted “is” for “shall be.”